Utah statutes.
26-2-10.   Supplementary certificate of birth.

(1)  Any person born in this state who is legitimized by the subsequent marriage of his natural parents, or whose parentage has been determined by any U.S. state court or Canadian provincial court having jurisdiction, or who has been legally adopted under the law of this or any other state or any province of Canada, may request the state registrar to register a supplementary certificate of birth on the basis of that status.

(2)  The application for registration of a supplementary certificate may be made by the person requesting registration, if he is of legal age, by a legal representative, or by any agency authorized to receive children for placement or adoption under the laws of this or any other state.

(3) (a)  The state registrar shall require that an applicant submit identification and proof according to department rules.

(b)  In the case of an adopted person, that proof may be established by order of the court in which the adoption proceedings were held.

(4) (a)  After the supplementary certificate is registered, any information disclosed from the record shall be from the supplementary certificate.

(b)  Access to the original certificate and to the evidence submitted in support of the supplementary certificate are not open to inspection except upon the order of a Utah district court  or as provided under Section 78B-6-144.

